Washington statutes.
RCW 15.60.075

Apiary coordinated areas—Order describing.

Within thirty days after the conclusion of any such hearing the county legislative authority shall make an order describing the apiary coordinated areas within the county as to the maximum allowable number of hives per site, the minimum allowable distance between sites, and the minimum required setback from property lines. The order shall be entered upon the records of the county and published in a newspaper having general circulation in the county at least once each week for four successive weeks.

[ 1989 c 354 s 66. Formerly RCW 15.60.190.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.